Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.900

Severability—1957 c 153.

If any part, or parts, of this chapter shall be held unconstitutional, the remaining provisions shall be given full force and effect, as completely as if the part held unconstitutional had not been included therein, if any such remaining part can then be administered in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1957 c 153 s 46.]